Indiana, session 2026, HB1108.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 8-23-9-3 IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. Except as provided in sections 4,
and 4.5, and 4.7 of this chapter, the commissioner shall let the contract
for the construction, improvement, or maintenance of the road to the
lowest and best bidder. The determination of the lowest and best bidder
must include any requirement imposed under section 13 of this chapter.
The lowest and best bid may not be for a greater sum than the
estimated cost of the project.
SECTION 2. IC 8-23-9-4.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 4.7. Notwithstanding any other statute or rule
adopted by the department, the commissioner may let a contract
to a bidder that is not the lowest and best bidder if all of the
following apply:
(1) The commissioner determines the bidder is responsive and
qualified.
(2) The bidder commits to employing Indiana residents for
2026 IN 1108—LS 6532/DI 137


not less than sixty-five percent (65%) of the total workforce
for the project. For purposes of this subdivision, an individual
is considered an Indiana resident if the individual's primary
residence was located in Indiana for not less than twelve (12)
consecutive months prior to the anticipated commencement
of work on the project.
(3) The amount of the bidder's bid is not more than:
(A) five percent (5%) greater than the amount of the bid
submitted by the lowest and best bidder; and
(B) the estimated cost of the project.
(4) The commissioner determines that awarding the contract
to the bidder is in the best interests of the project and the
community.
(5) The bidder demonstrates the following:
(A) Participation in a registered apprenticeship program
recognized by the United States Department of Labor that
is applicable to the work being performed.
(B) Use of a workforce whose employment eligibility has
been verified through the federal E-Verify program or an
equivalent employment authorization program, with
worker verification numbers provided to the
commissioner.
(C) Maintenance of a policy prohibiting the use of
independent contractors on the project.
(D) Submission of certified payroll reports to the
commissioner verifying compliance with all applicable
wage and labor standards.
2026 IN 1108—LS 6532/DI 137